Ohio, session 136, HB328.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. (A) The Director of Children and Youth shall 7
establish and administer, with the assistance of the Director of 8
Natural Resources, a one-time grant program that provides up to 9
seventy-five per cent reimbursement to local government entities 10
for the acquisition, development, or rehabilitation of outdoor 11
spaces, parks, playgrounds, pools, splash pads, and recreation 12
centers. 13
(B) A local government entity, including a township, 14
village, city, county, park district, joint recreation district, 15
and conservancy district may apply to the Director of Children 16
and Youth for a grant under this section. The applicant shall 17
include the following in the application: 18
(1) Proof that the applicant holds the title to or has a 19

H. B. No. 328 Page 2
As Introduced
non-revocable lease of at least fifteen years to the property 20
listed for the grant; 21
(2) A plan that details the proposed development or 22
rehabilitation of the property; 23
(3) A plan to partner with a nonprofit organization or 24
community partner for the development of the property. 25
(C) Local government entities applying for a grant under 26
this section shall be given priority if they include either of 27
the following in the application: 28
(1) A plan developed with a nonprofit organization or 29
community partner that includes initiatives to create play area 30
capacity within their communities, including how to create 31
ongoing sustainability to support capacity-expanding initiatives 32
and identify the needs it would address; 33
(2) A plan to develop a learning lab on the property. 34
(D) As used in this section, "learning lab" means a 35
dedicated space within a facility designed for educational 36
activities that focus on teaching new skills, promoting 37
knowledge of health and wellness, or providing technology 38
training in an accessible setting for engagement by all members 39
of the community. 40
Section 2. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 41
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 42
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 43
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 44
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 45
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 46
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 47

H. B. No. 328 Page 3
As Introduced
Section 3. 48
49
50
1 2 3 4 5
A KID DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND YOUTH
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 830420 Community Projects and $10,250,000 $10,250,000
Assistance
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $10,250,000 $10,250,000
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $10,250,000 $10,250,000
COMMUNITY PROJECTS AND ASSISTANCE 51
Of the foregoing appropriation item 830420, Community 52
Projects and Assistance, $10,000,000 in each fiscal year shall 53
be used for the grant program to provide reimbursement to local 54
government entities for the acquisition, development, or 55
rehabilitation of outdoor spaces, parks, playgrounds, pools, 56
splash pads, and recreation centers described in Section 1 of 57
this act. 58
Of the foregoing appropriation item 830420, Community 59
Projects and Assistance, $250,000 in each fiscal year shall be 60
used to establish learning labs within local government 61
subdivision recreation centers. 62
Section 4. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 63
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 64
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 65

H. B. No. 328 Page 4
As Introduced
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 66
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 67
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 68
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 69
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 70
of the 136th General Assembly. 71
Section 5. This act shall be known as the Fit, Safe, and 72
Strong Communities Act. 73